Tennessee, session 114, HB0566.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 4, Chapter 3, Part 10, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
(a) As used in this section, "gun violence" means homicide, violent crime, and
domestic violence.
(b) The department of finance and administration, office of criminal justice
programs, may use existing resources, if available, and seek appropriate funding and
resources from the federal and state governments to design and implement grants to
reduce gun violence in this state.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0566
001329
- 1 -